Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5959YC (2) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Prohibit any increase in the amount of 3 tuition or mandatory fees charged by an institution of higher 4 education under the boardâs control to resident undergraduate 5 students on or after the effective date of this Act. This 6 paragraph is repealed July 1, 2031. 7 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 8 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9